Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-190
Suit against state or governmental agency; summons; service.

The state and governmental agencies created by the state may be sued in the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court upon claims for compensation benefits under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act in the same manner as provided by such act for suits against individuals and corporations. In such proceedings summons issued by the compensation court shall be served in the manner provided for service of a summons in section 25-510.02. The issuance and service of summons in such manner shall be binding upon the state and such agencies in such actions, and the Attorney General is hereby authorized and empowered to waive the issuance and service of summons and enter voluntary appearance in such suits against the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1940, Spec. Sess., c. 1, § 1, p. 53;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-180;

R.S.1943, § 48-190;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 70;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 119;

Laws 1997, LB 165, § 3.